src/phonology/olo-phon.twolc
"gToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__  aika: ajan
g:0 <=>
        [ Vow: - [ o | u ] ] _ i s (HarmDummy:) %> d: [ %{aä%}: %^WGStem: | i h ] ;
        [ Vow - [ o | u ] ] _ (HarmDummy:) e: (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 %> ;
!!€ väge%{front%}%^WGStem>n
!!€ vä0i00%>n
        [ Vow: - [ o | u ] ] _ i Cns:+ (HarmDummy:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ pagis%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}h
!!€ pa0is000%>tah



!2013-04-29! tToZero in weak
"tToZero in weak geminate"
 t:0 <=>
  _ t [ %{uy%}: | u | y | %{aäuyiØ%}: |Vow: ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
 Vow: _ t [ Vow: (%> i)| e h | Vow: Cns: ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
! [ # Cns* Vow | # Cns* Vow [ Vow - [ i | u | y ] ] | Vow h [ y | u ] ] _  GRC ;
!2013-04-29!        [ #: Cns*  Vow+ [ h | (r) t ] | Vow ( %^WGStem:0 %> ) t | Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ ( n ) t | Vow t ] _  [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;
!2013-04-29!        t _ Vow l %^WGStem:0 ; ! ottel- to otel-
!!€# tavoitteh%^WGStem
!!€0 tavoi0teh0

"tTol in weak infinite form"
t:l <=> l (HarmDummy:) %> _ (%{aä%}:|a|ä) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ kuul%>t%{aä%}%^WGStem
!!€ kuul%>la0

! luba : luvan
"b:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
b:v <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vow ( r | l | Vow ) _  [ GRC | %^TS:0 i (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;

"b:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
b:m <=> m _  [ a | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ; !!≈ @CODE@
!! }}}

!2013-04-29!"double pp to p"
!2013-04-29!p:0 <=> [ #: Cns* Vow ( m ) p | #: Cns* Vow Vow p | Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ p ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;
"p:0 in lapsi"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
p:0 <=> Vow _ s  (HarmDummy:) %^KS2S:0  ;
 Vow: _ p Vow: (HarmDummy:) (%^RmVow:) (%> i) %^WGStem:0  ;
!!€ kuoppa%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow%>i%>l
!!€ kuo0p0000%>i%>l

!2013-04-29! Vowel raising
!2013-04-29!"o:u ö:y in Inf"
!2013-04-29! Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx: %> v v %{aä%}: %^RVow:0 ;
!2013-04-29!           Vx: _ %> v v %{aä%}: %^RVow:0 ;
!2013-04-29!          where Vx in (o ö)
!2013-04-29!                Vy in (u y) matched ;

!! !!Consonant loss
"d:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__   pidiä:piän
d:0 <=>  # Cns* [ i | a: | o | ä ] _ [ ä: | a: | e: | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
!!€# pidä%^WGStem%>n
!!€0 pi0ä0%>n

"s:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__   
 s:0 <=>  [ u | u a | e ] _ s [ ä: | a: ( (HarmDummy:) %^A2O: %> i) | e: | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
!!€# bussa%^WGStem%>l
!!€0 bu0sa0%>l


!"Disallow V3 after two consecutive realized vowels"
! V3: /<= :Vow :0* :Vow :0* _ ;

"Disallow a:u before a and %> i"
a:u /<= _ a: %> i ;


!!TESTS
!echo 'A v r a a m {back}:0 > {aä}:a n' | hfst-pair-test src/phonology/olo-phon.compose.hfst
!echo 'Avraam+N+Prop+Sg+Nom' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
